Arkansas, session 2025, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the State
Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U034U DDSSA DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE03
(2) L003N CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 1 GRADE MP09
(3) L025N SENIOR PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 2 GRADE MP08
(4) L024N DDSSA MEDICAL SPECIALIST 26 GRADE MP07
*LCW015*
01/06/2025 2:35:36 PM LCW015

HB1098
(5) L012N DDSSA MEDICAL CONSULTANT 11 GRADE MP06
(6) L027N DDSSA PSYCHOLOGY SPECIALIST 7 GRADE MP05
(7) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(8) D121C BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(9) D042C DATA WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(10) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 6 GRADE IT05
(11) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(12) A145C DDSSA CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS14
(13) G234C DDSSA PROGRAM DIRECTOR 4 GRADE GS13
(14) G059C DDSSA ASST DIRECTOR 5 GRADE GS12
(15) G292C DDSSA PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(16) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(17) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(18) E067C DDSSA PROGRAM EDUCATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(19) G233C DDSSA SECTION MANAGER 9 GRADE GS11
(20) X207C DDSSA ADJUDICATOR V 185 GRADE GS10
(21) G258C DDSSA HEARING OFFICER 5 GRADE GS10
(22) X203C DDSSA QUALITY ASSURANCE SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS10
(23) G112C DDSSA UNIT SUPERVISOR 28 GRADE GS10
(24) X190C DDSSA ADJUDICATOR IV 79 GRADE GS09
(25) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(26) X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR III 118 GRADE GS08
(27) X070C DDSSA FRAUD INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(28) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(29) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(30) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(31) X104C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR II 2 GRADE GS07
(32) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(33) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS06
(34) X143C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR I 3 GRADE GS06
(35) G199C DDSSA PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS OFFICER 1 GRADE GS06
(36) X201C DDSSA ADJUDICATIVE SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS05
(37) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(38) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 1 GRADE GS05
(39) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(40) C049C DDSSA ADJUDICATIVE ASSISTANT 58 GRADE GS04
01/06/2025 2:35:36 PM LCW015

HB1098
(41) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(42) R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 594

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the State
Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: twenty (20) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the State Department for Social Security Administration Disability
Determination, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the State Department for Social Security Administration
Disability Determination for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $40,681,819
(02) EXTRA HELP 450,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,472,435
(04) OVERTIME 2,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,184,400
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 26,500
(C) PROF. FEES 13,926,285
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 75,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $77,816,439

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
01/06/2025 2:35:36 PM LCW015

HB1098
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ADDITIONAL
POSITIONS. The Director of the State Department for Social Security
Administration Disability Determination, after receiving the approval of the
Office of Personnel Management, and after seeking prior review by the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, shall have the
authority to establish such new additional full time positions as may become
necessary to carry out the objectives of the department and/or to meet
Federal requirements of new and/or expanded programs where such needs are
financed by Federal funds; provided that not more than two hundred fifty
(250) positions may be created in addition to those authorized in the Regular
Salaries section of this Act.
If the department requests continuation of any positions as established
herein, the positions must be requested as new positions in the department's
budget request.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

01/06/2025 2:35:36 PM LCW015

HB1098
SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

























01/06/2025 2:35:36 PM LCW015